Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2468.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Rotary International peace pole monument; procedures; delayed repeal A. Pursuant to section 41-1363, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, this act authorizes the legislative council to provide for the placement in the area described in section 41-1304.05, subsection B, paragraph 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, of a Rotary International peace pole monument dedicated to promoting peace around the world. B. The procedures prescribed in section 41-1363, Arizona Revised Statutes, apply to the establishment of the monument. C. Public monies are not authorized for the costs of the monument. All fundraising and contracts for artistic design and construction of the memorial are the sole responsibility of the proponents. This state may not facilitate fundraising or establish a state fund for the deposit of the monies. D. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2029.